Massachusetts, session 194th, H3273.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 60A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 13, the figure “90%” and inserting in
place thereof the following figure:- 95%.
SECTION 2. Said section 1 of said chapter 60A, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out, in line 14, the figure “60%” and inserting in place thereof the following
figure:- 70%.
SECTION 3. Said section 1of said chapter 60A, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out, in line 15, the figure “40%” and inserting in place thereof the following
figure:- 45%.
of 1